Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1271.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 304(a) and (b) of the act of June 30, 1987 (P.L.163, No.16), known as the Rural Pennsylvania Revitalization Act, are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 304. Grants.(a) Eligibility.--Grants shall be available only to the qualified faculty members of [the various colleges and university members of the State System of Higher Education and the current land grant university and the regional campuses of the University of Pittsburgh] an institution of higher education located in this Commonwealth.12345678910111213141516171819202122 (b) Amounts.--No grant shall exceed the sum of [$60,000] $100,000.* * *(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Institution of higher education." Includes the following:(1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(2) A university within the State System of Higher Education.(3) The Pennsylvania State University, the University of Pittsburgh, Temple University, Lincoln University, the Pennsylvania College of Technology or any other institution designated as State-related by the Commonwealth.(4) The Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology.(5) A college established under Article XIX-G of the Public School Code of 1949.(6) An institution of higher education located in and incorporated or chartered by the Commonwealth and entitled to confer degrees as provided in 24 Pa.C.S. § 6505 (relating to power to confer degrees) and as provided for by the standards and qualifications prescribed by the State Board of Education under 24 Pa.C.S. Ch. 65 (relating to private colleges, universities and seminaries).(7) A private school licensed under the act of December 15, 1986 (P.L.1585, No.174), known as the Private Licensed Schools Act.(8) A foreign corporation approved to operate an 20260SB1271PN1584 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 educational enterprise under 22 Pa. Code Ch. 36 (relating to foreign corporation standards).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1271PN1584 - 3 - 123